Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1961XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 63 Section 1. IOWA CANCER RESEARCH PROGRAM ââ 1 APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the general fund of 2 the state to the department of health and human services for 3 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 4 2026, the following amount or so much thereof as is necessary 5 for the purposes designated: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,000,000 7 1. The moneys appropriated in this section shall be used by 8 the department of health and human services to create an Iowa 9 cancer research program within the division of public health of 10 the department to support cancer research projects at public 11 institutions of higher education in the state. 12 2. a. (1) Of the moneys appropriated in this section, 13 $1,250,000 is allocated to fund pediatric cancer research. The 14 department of health and human services shall issue a request 15 for proposals to select projects at public institutions of 16 higher education in the state that perform research focused 17 on reducing the quantity and impact of pediatric cancers, 18 including improving the quality of life for childhood cancer 19 survivors. 20 (2) Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,250,000 21 is allocated to fund cancer prevention research. The 22 department of health and human services shall issue a request 23 for proposals to select projects at public institutions of 24 higher education in the state that perform research focused on 25 identifying the reasons for Iowaâs high cancer incidence rate, 26 the reasons Iowaâs cancer incidence rate has increased rather 27 than declined, and ways to reduce the stateâs cancer incidence 28 rate. 29 (3) Of the moneys appropriated in this section, $1,250,000 30 is allocated to fund basic cancer research. The department of 31 health and human services shall issue a request for proposals 32 to select projects at public institutions of higher education 33 in the state that perform research focused on studying how the 34 body responds to cancer at the molecular and cellular levels to 35 -1- LSB 1961XS (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 63 provide the foundation for future advances in cancer research. 1 b. Criteria for selection of individual projects under this 2 subsection shall include the projectâs scientific rationale 3 and promise, the potential to benefit the current or future 4 health of Iowans, inclusion of collaborating experts from 5 various parts of the state or country with different areas of 6 expertise, the potential for economic return on investment, the 7 potential to benefit underserved populations, and whether the 8 project is eligible for any private or federal matching funds. 9 3. The department of health and human services may utilize 10 up to five percent of the moneys appropriated in this section 11 for administrative costs associated with the Iowa cancer 12 control program. 13